src/morphology/affixes/propernouns.lexc
!! Proper noun inflection
!! ----------------------
!! Veps proper nouns inflect in the same cases as regular
!! nouns. Veps acronyms, however, take a hyphen ('-') as a separator.

!!LEXICON ProperNounCases
!!+N+Prop:%:   Cases  ;
!!+N+Prop:%:   Cases  ;
!!+N+Prop:%:   Cases  ;
!!+N+Prop:%:   Cases  ;
!!+N+Prop:%:   Cases  ;
!!+N+Prop:%:   Cases  ;
!!        -    Nouns  ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!! PROPER NOUNS !!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON ACRONDELIMITER ! Here we need some kind of vowel harmony
    PROP ;
:%: PROP ;
:%- PROP ;
:%' PROP ;

LEXICON PROP
+Prop: NOUN ;


! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:
